New York, session 2025-2026, A7683.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 135-d 2 to read as follows: 3 § 135-d. Recordkeeping and reporting. Notwithstanding any other 4 provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, except as 5 provided by section one hundred thirty-five-c of this article regarding 6 electronic notarization, a notary shall not be required to create or 7 retain any other notarial record of any notarial act. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07500-01-5